Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 1 General Provisions
The facility is located within a county having a population of not less than seventeen thousand four hundred (17,400) nor more than seventeen thousand four hundred fifty (17,450), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility containing all of the following characteristics:

The facility owns and operates an eighteen (18) hole golf course that is open to the public, which includes putting greens and a driving range;

The facility operates a clubhouse facility of approximately five thousand square feet (5,000 sq. ft.), with seating at tables for at least eighty (80) persons and which clubhouse contains a full-service kitchen;

The facility operates a swimming pool;

The facility is located on a minimum of one hundred thirty-three (133) acres;

The facility is located adjacent to old Highway 45W and is situated within a county having a population of not less than forty-eight thousand one hundred twenty-five (48,125) nor more than forty-eight thousand two hundred (48,200), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census; and

The facility does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of gender, race, religion or national origin;

A commercially operated facility containing all of the following characteristics:

The facility has a marina with at least five hundred thirty (530) wet slips;

The facility has a minimum of two hundred fifty (250) paved single car parking spaces;

The facility has a restaurant with inside seating for at least eighty (80) persons and outside seating for at least sixty (60) persons;

The facility is located on a lake with at least eighteen thousand (18,000) acres of water and at least three hundred forty-two (342) miles of shore line; and

The facility is located within a county having a population of not less than seventeen thousand four hundred (17,400) nor more than seventeen thousand four hundred fifty (17,450), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility containing all of the following characteristics:

The facility includes a one hundred forty-seven thousand square foot (147,000 sq. ft.) boat and RV showroom and service center with retail sales of all types of camping and boating equipment as well as a boat and RV parts department;

The facility has a two hundred fifty (250) seat full service restaurant;

The facility has a two hundred fifty (250) site campground with two (2) swimming pools, cabins and a lodge;

The facility is a travel center with a store, pizzeria, delicatessen, fuel center;

The facility has an arcade;

The facility is located at 2475 Westel Road; and

The facility is located within a county having a population of not less than forty-six thousand eight hundred (46,800) nor more than forty-six thousand nine hundred (46,900), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility containing all of the following characteristics:

The facility has a marina with at least one hundred one (101) wet slips;

The facility has a minimum of sixty (60) paved single car parking spaces;

The facility has a restaurant with adequate and sanitary kitchen facilities with inside seating for at least forty (40) persons and outside seating for at least one hundred fifty (150) persons and is kept, used and maintained as a place where meals are served and where meals are actually and regularly served when the facility is opened for business; and

The facility is located within a county having a population of not less than thirty-one thousand one hundred (31,100) nor more than thirty-one thousand two hundred (31,200), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility which contains all of the following characteristics:

Is a bed and breakfast homestay, as defined in § 68-14-502(1)(B), that opened in 2008;

Has at least two (2) rooms available for overnight guests;

Is able to prepare on-site custom meals for up to thirty (30) persons;

Offers cooking classes; and

Is located within any county having a population of not less than one hundred eighty-two thousand (182,000) nor more than one hundred eighty-two thousand one hundred (182,100), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated recreational facility whether open to the public or limited to members and guests of an association or of the development on which it is located, owned, and operated by an association or corporation and in connection with an eighteen-hole golf course which facility is regularly kept, used, and maintained as a place where meals are actually and regularly served, with adequate and sanitary kitchen facilities, and which facility meets all the following characteristics:

The facility must have a clubhouse with no less than six thousand enclosed square feet (6,000 sq. ft.);

The facility must be located within the limits of a development that is within five hundred yards (500 yds.) of a water reservoir operated and maintained by the United States Army corps of engineers during 1998 or any subsequent years;

The facility must be located within at least three (3) miles of an airport with lighted runway of at least three thousand feet (3000') in length;

Maintenance within the recreational area of the following types of recreational facilities:

Golf course of at least eighteen (18) holes;

Swimming pool; and

Tennis court; and

The facility is located within a county having a population of not less than twenty-nine thousand eight hundred (29,800) nor more than twenty-nine thousand nine hundred (29,900), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A privately-owned resort and recreational facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Has at least ninety-five (95) acres located approximately five (5) miles south of Interstate 40 on Tennessee State Highway 13;

Is fronted on the west side by Tennessee State Highway 13 and bordered on the south side by a scenic river as defined in title 11, chapter 13, part 1;

Has at least four (4) cabins;

Has at least thirty (30) recreational vehicle pads and sites with full electrical, water and sewer hookups;

Has at least a forty-seat restaurant which has been approved by the local health department that has an approved beer permit and has food available, with exceptions of closures for private groups or events, seasonal closures, vacations, general maintenance and remodeling by the owners;

When used in this subdivision (27)(EEE), the “facility” shall include any location within the property designated by the licensee;

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion, or national origin; and

Is located within any county having a population of not less than seven thousand six hundred (7,600) nor more than seven thousand seven hundred (7,700), according to the 2000 census or any subsequent federal census; and the legislative body of such county adopts a resolution endorsing such resort and recreational facility as a premier type tourist resort as defined in this subdivision (27);

A commercially operated facility containing all of the following characteristics:

Has a restaurant serving an upscale menu featuring lobster tail, crab legs and fresh cut steaks;

Is located on a lake by a marina;

Has a boat dock within walking distance of the restaurant;

Has indoor seating for approximately one hundred thirty (130) diners and outdoor dining on the patio with seating for approximately one hundred eighty (180);

Offers live entertainment on the patio at its Tiki Bar; and

Is located in any county having a population of not less than forty-four thousand two hundred (44,200) nor more than forty-four thousand three hundred (44,300), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A privately-owned resort and recreational facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Has a dock with marina which has at least one hundred seventy (170) boat slips which is located on or near the four hundred eighty-two (482) mile marker on the Tennessee River;

Has an outside gazebo which is used for various functions;

Has a restaurant with a dining room of at least four thousand two hundred square feet (4,200 sq. ft.), which seats at least two hundred (200) persons both indoors and outdoors, including an outdoor balcony; and which serves meals at least four (4) days on a weekly basis including Sunday brunch, with exceptions of closures for private groups or events; and seasonal closures, vacations, general maintenance and remodeling by the owners;

When used in this subdivision (27)(GGG), the “facility” shall include any location within the property designated by the licensee; and

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion, or national origin;

A commercially operated facility containing all of the following characteristics:

Regularly serves meals at tables and continuously maintains adequate kitchen facilities;

Has indoor seating for approximately one hundred twenty (120) diners and outdoor seating for approximately one hundred thirty (130);

Is located on the banks of the Cumberland River;

Has a transient boat dock within walking distance of the restaurant;

Specializes in serving catfish and is often referred to as “the Catfish Place under the bridge”; and

Is located in any county having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand one hundred (39,100) nor more than thirty-nine thousand two hundred (39,200), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A bed and breakfast possessing each of the following characteristics:

The house is approximately ten thousand square feet (10,000 sq. ft.) and has rooms for approximately twelve (12) guests to stay overnight;

Has a smaller upper level patio and a larger, lower level patio;

Has a main dining room on the first floor which can accommodate approximately seventy (70) guests. The main dining room is one (1) large room with floor to ceiling windows providing one hundred eighty degrees (180°) of lakefront viewing;

Has accommodations for an additional forty (40) guests for outside dining;

Is located in the Long Branch portion of Dale Hollow Lake;

The property on which the bed and breakfast is situated has space for weddings, family reunions and other large gatherings on the large outside portion of the property; and

Is located in any county having a population of less than seven thousand eight hundred fifty-one (7,851) nor more than seven thousand eight hundred sixty-five (7,865), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A hotel possessing all of the following characteristics:

Contains at least twenty five (25) rooms for the sleeping accommodations of guests;

Is registered as a national historic landmark;

Is located within a central business improvement district; and

Is located in any county having a population of not less than four hundred thirty-two thousand two hundred (432,200) nor more than four hundred thirty-two thousand three hundred (432,300), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated recreational facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Is located at least two hundred feet (200') from a natural lake that is located in or near a state park, which has waterfowl hunting and fishing is available year round;

Has a restaurant which has:

A beer license;

A commercial kitchen; and

Seating for at least seventy-five (75); and

Has a boat ramp and boat dock;

A commercially operated facility containing all of the following characteristics:

The facility has a restaurant open year-round with inside seating for at least seventy-five (75) persons;

The facility has a minimum of eighty-five (85) parking spaces;

The facility is located on Highway 70 less than three (3) miles from Center Hill Lake; and

The facility is located within a county having a population of not less than eighteen thousand seven hundred (18,700) nor more than eighteen thousand seven hundred fifty (18,750), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated recreational facility possessing all of the following characteristics:

A golf course of at least eighteen (18) holes;

Wooded trails for horseback riding;

A fully stocked fishing pond;

At least three (3) tennis courts;

Located in any county having a population of not less than one hundred eighty-three thousand one hundred (183,100) nor more than one hundred eighty-three thousand two hundred (183,200), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census; and

Is located no more than two thousand feet (2,000') from the right-of-way of Interstate 840 and must be directly adjacent to Arno Road;

The premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(MMM) means any or all of the property that constitutes the facility, including swimming pools, tennis courts, golf courses, paths, and road crossings. A license shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing;

A commercially owned marina containing all of the following characteristics:

Operates as a marina on approximately forty-six (46) acres of land;

Has a restaurant with at least one hundred ten (110) seats;

Has approximately two hundred (200) boat slips;

Has seven (7) cabins; and

Is located in a county having a population of not less than forty-four thousand five hundred (44,500) nor more than forty-four thousand six hundred (44,600), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility containing all of the following characteristics:

Operates as a hunting lodge on approximately four hundred (400) acres of land;

Has adequate kitchen facilities and a dining area within the hunting lodge with seating of at least fifty (50) at tables;

Has capacity to sleep at least thirty (30) guests within the main hunting lodge and at least twenty (20) guests in a cabin located on the property; and

Is located off I-40 at Exit 311 in any county having a population of not less than fifty-six thousand (56,000) nor more than fifty-six thousand one hundred (56,100), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility open to the public for persons twenty-one (21) years of age or older that has all of the following characteristics:

Is located within three (3) miles of Dale Hollow Lake;

Has a kitchen that serves food to customers;

Is licensed to sell beer;

Is located in an A frame building built in 1968;

Has a deck of more than one thousand square feet (1,000 sq. ft); and

Is located in any county having a population of not less than seven thousand eight hundred fifty-one (7,851) nor more than seven thousand eight hundred sixty-five (7,865), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated resort, restaurant, marina and recreational facility possessing all of the following characteristics:

Is located on at least five (5) acres but no more than seven (7) acres at day marker four (4) as designated by the Tennessee Valley authority on Norris Lake;

Has a marina with at least one hundred forty-five (145) boat slips, most of which are contracted for use on an annual basis, but also includes use for drive-ups;

Rents pontoon, ski, and house boats;

Has a marina store;

Has a restaurant with a full service kitchen with combined seating indoors and outdoors for at least one hundred (100) patrons;

Has a restaurant that serves at least twelve (12) meals on a weekly basis with exceptions of closures for private groups or events, seasonal reasons, vacations, general maintenance and remodeling by the owners;

Has special events and weddings inside and outside;

Has at least fifty-five (55) condominiums with at least thirty (30) of the condominiums available for rental on a nightly or weekly basis;

Has a restaurant that possesses a beer permit for on and off-premises consumption;

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion, or national origin; and

Is located in a county having a population of not less than forty thousand seven hundred (40,700) nor more than forty thousand eight hundred (40,800), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

The facility licensed pursuant to this subdivision (27)(QQQ) shall make food available at any time when alcoholic beverages are being served.

When used in this subdivision (27)(QQQ), “facility” means any location within the property as designated by the licensee;

A commercially operated marina, restaurant, and recreational facility possessing all of the following characteristics:

Is located on at least thirty-two (32) acres of land located off Old Awalt Road;

Has a marina with at least two hundred fifty (250) wet slips located on Tims Ford Lake;

Has a restaurant with a dining room to accommodate at least two hundred (200) patrons;

Includes at least five (5) rental cabins and a motel with at least (5) rental units on its grounds; and

Has a fuel dock with a stationary tank that holds at least six thousand gallons (6,000 gals.) of fuel;

A commercially operated mountaintop resort and recreational facility possessing all of the following characteristics:

Is located on at least one thousand two hundred (1,200) acres at an altitude of between two thousand five hundred feet (2,500') and three thousand feet (3,000');

Provides nightly lodging in at least eleven (11) furnished suites with balconies, all of which are located in at least two (2) buildings;

Has a restaurant with a full service kitchen with combined seating indoors and outdoors for at least one hundred (100) patrons; and which serves at least twelve (12) meals on a weekly basis with exceptions of closures for private groups or events; and seasonal closures, vacations, general maintenance and remodeling by the owners; provided, however, that food shall be made available at any time when alcoholic beverages are being served; and such restaurant shall already possess a beer permit for on-premises consumption;

Hosts special on-site events including weddings, receptions, reunions, corporate meetings, and club or group gatherings;

Has a wooden walkway through chimney rock formations;

Has a heliport with at least two (2) landing pads;

When used in this subdivision (27)(SSS), “facility” includes any location within the property as designated by the licensee;

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion, or national origin; and

Is located in a county having a population of not less than forty thousand seven hundred (40,700) nor more than forty thousand eight hundred (40,800), according to the 2010 census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially owned marina, resort, and recreational facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Includes a full service marina that includes at least one hundred thirty (130) boat slips with the capacity to have three hundred seventy-five (375) covered boat slips ranging in size from twenty-four feet (24') to thirty feet (30') deep; and which is located opposite the one hundred and thirty-three and one-third R (133.3R) mile marker on the Clinch River on Norris Lake;

Has a public pump station;

Has a restaurant with at least one hundred (100) seats both indoors and outdoors which serves at least six (6) meals on a weekly basis, with exceptions of closures for private groups or events, and seasonal closures, vacations, general maintenance, and remodeling by the owners;

Has a ship store;

Has gas docks;

Has a marina campground with at least twenty (20) campsites with electric, water, and wastewater connections;

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion, or national origin; and

The facility is located within a county having a population of not less than thirty-two thousand two hundred (32,200) nor more than thirty-two thousand three hundred (32,300), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census. When used in this subdivision (27)(TTT), “facility” includes any location within the property designated by the licensee;

A commercially or privately operated facility containing all of the following characteristics:

Is located on Tellico Lake, containing a minimum area of six hundred fifty (650) contiguous acres;

Has an information and sales center;

Has public access walking trails;

Has a championship golf course of at least eighteen (18) holes;

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion or national origin; and

Is located within any county having a population of not less than forty-eight thousand five hundred (48,500) nor more than forty-eight thousand six hundred (48,600), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

The premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(UUU) shall mean any or all of the property that constitutes the facility, including, but not limited to, clubhouses, restaurants, gift and pro shops, marinas, swimming pools, tennis courts, golf courses, and paths and road crossings. A licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises and such drawing may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing;

A commercially operated private tennis club possessing all of the following characteristics:

Is located on at least thirteen (13) acres of land located off Racquet Club Way;

Has at least ten (10) indoor hard tennis courts located indoors;

Has at least five (5) hard tennis courts and at least twelve (12) clay tennis courts located outdoors; and

Includes a five thousand square foot (5,000 sq. ft.) club house on its grounds;

A commercially operated recreational facility possessing all of the following characteristics:

Has a banquet room that seats not less than seventy-five (75) people;

Has a semi-private golf course of at least eighteen (18) holes;

Has a club house, restaurant that serves food, and swimming pool;

Is located not less than one (1) mile from Interstate 40 and is adjacent to Golf Course Road;

Is located in a county having a population of not less than thirty-five thousand six hundred (35,600) nor more than thirty-five thousand seven hundred (35,700), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially owned marina, resort and recreational facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Includes a full service marina that includes at least one hundred (100) covered boat slips, at least thirty-five (35) mooring line buoys, at least five (5) floating home rentals, and offers for rental at least fourteen (14) watercraft of various types including ski-boats, single and double deck pontoons, jet skis, and standup paddle boats; and which is located at Big Creek Mile eight.zero L (8.0L), Whitman Hollow Branch Norris Reservoir;

Has a restaurant with at least seventy-five (75) seats combined indoors and outdoors, which serves at least ten (10) meals on a weekly basis, with exceptions of closures for private groups or events, and seasonal closures, vacations, general maintenance and remodeling by the owners; provided, however, that food shall be made available at any time that alcoholic beverages are being served;

Has at least seven (7) campsites;

Has at least two (2) vacation rental homes;

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion, or national origin; and

Is located in any county having a population of not less than forty thousand seven hundred (40,700) nor more than forty thousand eight hundred (40,800), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially owned marina, resort and recreational facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Has a full service marina that includes at least three hundred (300) boat slips and is located on Norris Lake;

Has a restaurant with at least seventy-two (72) indoor seats and seventy-two (72) outdoor seats, which serves at least ten (10) meals on a weekly basis, with exceptions of closures for private groups or events, and seasonal closures, vacations, general maintenance and remodeling by the owners; provided, however, that food shall be made available at any time that alcoholic beverages are being served;

Has a motel with at least twenty-four (24) rooms;

Has at least two (2) vacation rental cabins and at least twenty-three (23) recreational vehicle (RV) slots;

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion, or national origin; and

Is located in any county having a population of not less than forty thousand seven hundred (40,700) nor more than forty thousand eight hundred (40,800), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Has adequate kitchen facilities and a dining area within the facility that has a seating capacity of at least fifty (50);

Is within four (4) miles of Douglas Lake;

Is located on the corner of Greenhill Road and Hwy 25-70 within one (1) mile of I-40 at Exit 415; and

Is located in a county having a population of not less than fifty-one thousand four hundred (51,400) nor more than fifty-one thousand five hundred (51,500), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A privately owned resort and recreational facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Is located off U.S. Highway 421 in any county having a population of not less than eighteen thousand two hundred (18,200) nor more than eighteen thousand three hundred (18,300), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

Has a semi-private golf course of at least eighteen (18) holes;

Has at least twenty (20) accommodation units;

Has at least two (2) tennis courts;

Has at least one (1) swimming pool;

Has a restaurant that seats at least fifty (50) people; and

Has a meeting facility;

The premises of any resort and recreational facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(AAAA) shall mean any or all of the property that constitutes the resort and facility, including, but not limited to, clubhouses, restaurants, gift and pro shops, swimming pools, tennis courts, golf courses, and paths and road crossings. A licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, and such drawing may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing;

It is lawful for any establishment located in a municipality having a population of not less than six hundred (600) nor more than six hundred ten (610), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, which is located in a county having a population of not less than two hundred sixty-two thousand six hundred (262,600) nor more than two hundred sixty-two thousand seven hundred (262,700), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, that is licensed to serve beer to also serve alcoholic beverages and wine to be consumed on the premises, subject to the further provisions of this chapter other than § 57-4-103;

A commercially owned marina, resort, and recreational facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Includes a full-service marina that includes at least one hundred fifty (150) boat slips and is located on Norris Lake;

Has at least eight (8) campsites;

Has a restaurant with at least eighty (80) seats, which serves at least ten (10) meals on a weekly basis, with exceptions of closures for private groups or events, and seasonal closures, vacations, general maintenance, and remodeling by the owners; provided, however, that food shall be made available at any time that alcoholic beverages are being served;

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion, or national origin; and

Is located in any county having a population of not less than forty thousand seven hundred (40,700) nor more than forty thousand eight hundred (40,800), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Is located within a one thousand foot (1,000') radius from the intersection of U.S. Highway 41A and University Avenue/Lake O'Donnell Road on property owned by a private institution of higher education, the campus of which is at least ten thousand (10,000) acres;

Is located in any county having a population of not less than forty-one thousand (41,000) nor more than forty-one thousand one hundred (41,100), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

Has prepared and served hot food for on-site dining with indoor seating for at least twenty-five (25) persons for at least twenty-four (24) months; and

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion, or national origin;

An entity that is authorized by the department of environment and conservation to operate a restaurant or other food and beverage service on the premises of a state park;

It is lawful for any establishment located in a municipality having a population of not less than four hundred ninety (490) nor more than four hundred ninety-nine (499), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, which is located in a county having a population of not less than thirty-two thousand two hundred (32,200) nor more than thirty-two thousand three hundred (32,300), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, that is licensed to serve beer to also serve alcoholic beverages and wine to be consumed on the premises, subject to the further provisions of this chapter other than § 57-4-103;

A commercially operated facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Is located in any county having a metropolitan form of government with a population of more than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

Regularly serves meals;

Contains an adequate and sanitary kitchen;

Has seating for not less than forty (40) people at tables;

Is located on floatation devices on the Cumberland river in close proximity to a marina; and

May be seasonally closed;

A commercially operated recreational facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Is located:

On at least two thousand five hundred (2,500) acres, approximately eight (8) miles from an interstate highway; and

Along a waterway that flows into a river, a portion of which has been designated as a scenic river;

Has at least twelve (12) cabins and at least three hundred fifty (350) campsites;

Has a motor cross trail or trails and a horseback riding trail or trails;

Has a restaurant with seating for at least one hundred (100);

Has a one thousand six hundred square foot (1,600 sq. ft.) stage at an amphitheater that seats approximately two thousand five hundred (2,500); and

Has least five (5) hotels or motels located near the facility;

A commercially operated facility containing all of the following characteristics:

Is located:

On at least twenty-two (22) acres;

Within a county having a population of not less than seventy-two thousand three hundred (72,300) nor more than seventy-two thousand four hundred (72,400), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census; and

At least two (2) miles north of the city of Cookeville, Tennessee;

Has been an LLC corporation since 2013;

Accommodates overnight lodging for up to fourteen (14) guests;

Is available for special events for up to five hundred (500) guests, including, but not limited to, weddings, receptions, corporate events, fundraisers, and reunions; and

Has on-site parking for up to two hundred fifty (250) vehicles;

A commercially operated facility possessing all of the following characteristics:

Is located in a home built in 1892;

Is located on 3rd Avenue South;

Has eight thousand square feet (8,000 sq. ft.) of space including an outside courtyard;

Hosts on-site special events including weddings, receptions, and group gatherings;

Has an adequate and sanitary kitchen; and

Is located in any county having a population of not less than one hundred eighty-three thousand one hundred (183,100) nor more than one hundred eighty-three thousand two hundred (183,200), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility containing all of the following characteristics:

The facility is located on at least two hundred fifty (250) acres;

The facility provides camping and additional overnight accommodations;

The facility serves at least one (1) meal per day in a dining room that seats at least fifty (50) persons; and

The facility must be located within a commercial district which contains a former state penitentiary that was in operation for a minimum of fifty (50) years;

A commercially operated facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Has been in operation as an inn since November 3, 2002;

Is located within one-half (½) mile of a city park;

Has a total of eight (8) guest rooms in the main house;

Has a separate cottage that also houses at least one (1) transient suite, as well as workspaces and storage;

Has at least one (1) kitchen on the premises and offers at least one (1) meal daily;

Has an open-air, outdoor patio suitable for the accommodation of wedding ceremonies and other events;

Has been designated historically significant by a county historical commission; and

Is located in any county having a population of more than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility possessing all of the following characteristics:

Has a restaurant open at least six (6) days a week with seating at tables for at least one hundred (100) persons;

Is licensed to sell beer;

Is located in a structure of not less than six thousand square feet (6,000 sq. ft.);

Is located on Drew Howard Road; and

Is located in any county having a population of not less than fifty-six thousand (56,000) nor more than fifty-six thousand one hundred (56,100), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated marina, resort, and recreational facility that:

Is located between day markers fifteen (15) and sixteen (16) on Douglas Lake;

Operates not less than eighty-eight (88) covered slips, one hundred ten (110) open slips, twelve (12) transient slips, and six (6) house boat slips;

Operates a full-service store offering fuel, live bait and tackle, food, and beverages;

Is open not less than three hundred sixty-three (363) days per year;

Rents pontoons, fishing boats, and paddle boards;

Operates a boat ramp that is open year-round;

Operates a recreational vehicle (RV) campground with not less than seventy (70) RV sites;

Operates not less than seven (7) rental properties; and

Is located in a county having a population of not less than fifty-one thousand four hundred (51,400) nor more than fifty-one thousand five hundred (51,500), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

The facility operates a full service hotel;

The facility operates a restaurant with not less than thirty-two (32) seats in the dining room, eight (8) seats in the bar, and twenty-eight (28) outdoor seats located under a wrap-around porch;

The facility operates a nine-hole golf course and a golf lodge;

The facility serves as a wedding and events venue; and

The facility is located within one (1) mile of Highway 41A and within two (2) miles of Lake O'Donnell in a county with a population of not less than forty-one thousand (41,000) and not more than forty-one thousand one hundred (41,100), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility possessing all of the following characteristics:

Has a restaurant open at least six (6) days a week with seating at tables for at least one hundred (100) persons and with additional seasonal seating on a patio for at least eighty (80) persons;

Is licensed to sell beer;

Is located in a structure of not less than two thousand five hundred square feet (2,500 sq. ft.);

Is located on Peavine Road; and

Is located in any county having a population of not less than fifty-six thousand (56,000) nor more than fifty-six thousand one hundred (56,100), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility having all of the following characteristics:

The facility has approximately sixty-one thousand square feet (61,000 sq. ft.) of interior space;

The facility is located not more than six thousand feet (6,000') southwest of a federal interstate highway and not more than two hundred feet (200') west of a federal highway;

The property that the facility is located on is not less than five hundred seventy-five feet (575') and not more than six hundred fifteen feet (615') above sea level;

The facility was originally constructed in 2017;

The facility has one (1) permanent structure containing five (5) stories and includes at least one (1) commercial kitchen, an atrium with a glass ceiling having a height of at least thirty feet (30') with live trees, and a rooftop deck with table service;

The facility is located in or adjacent to a commercial real estate development containing approximately one hundred (100) specialty stores and eateries, and a movie theater;

The facility is located within one hundred feet (100') of a commercial bank that is a member of the federal deposit insurance corporation;

The facility is approximately one thousand eight hundred twenty feet (1,820') to the northeast of Sugartree Creek;

The facility is approximately four hundred seventy feet (470') to the northwest of the main building of a public high school that was originally constructed before 1939;

The facility is approximately one thousand four hundred fifty feet (1,450') to the southwest of a public library that was originally constructed before 2000;

The facility is located within a county with a metropolitan form of government having a population of not less than six hundred thousand (600,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census; and

The facility must not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion, or national origin;

The premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(QQQQ) means any or all of the property that constitutes the facility. A licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing;

An agritourism facility possessing all of the following characteristics:

Is located on at least three hundred (300) owned or leased acres;

Is located within a county having a metropolitan form of government and a population of not less than six hundred thousand (600,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

Is bounded on one (1) side by at least three-quarters (¾) of a mile of the Cumberland River and on the other side by one-half (½) of a mile of a state scenic highway;
